Hawaii statutes.
§602-57 Jurisdiction. Notwithstanding
any other law to the contrary, the intermediate appellate court shall have
jurisdiction, subject to transfer as provided in section 602-58 or review on
application for a writ of certiorari as provided in section 602-59:

(1) To hear and determine appeals from any court or
agency when appeals are allowed by law;

(2) To entertain, in its discretion, any case
submitted without suit when there is a question of law that could be the
subject of a civil action or proceeding in the circuit court, or tax appeal
court, and the parties agree upon the facts upon which the controversy depends;
and

(3) To make or issue any order or writ necessary or
appropriate in the aid of its jurisdiction, and in such case, any judge may
issue a writ or an order to show cause returnable before the court. [L 1979, c
111, pt of §3; am L 2004, c 202, §57; am L 2006, c 94, §1 and c 145, §1; am L
2010, c 109, §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

The Lum Court, Land Use, and the Environment: A Survey of
Hawai‘i Case Law 1983 to 1991. 14 UH L. Rev. 119 (1992).

The Development of Hawai‘i's Appellate Courts: An
Organizational Perspective. 33 UH L. Rev. 875 (2011).

Case Notes

Section 174C-60 is inconsistent with and cannot stand
together with §602-5 and this section, as amended by Act 202, L 2004, and was
deemed amended by implication, effective July 1, 2006, to authorize appeals
from the water commission to the intermediate appellate court, not to the
supreme court. 113 H. 52, 147 P.3d 836 (2006).

Where bankruptcy court remanded the entirety of the adversary
proceeding to the circuit court, and petitioner timely appealed to the
appellate court the bankruptcy court's good faith determination which had not
been modified or set aside by the circuit court and thus remained in effect,
since this section gives the appellate court jurisdiction over appeals from the
circuit court that are "allowed by law", and §663-15.5(e) authorized
an appeal from the good faith determination, the appellate court had jurisdiction
over the appeal. 125 H. 186, 256 P.3d 694 (2011).

Court will not decide moot question. 1 H. App. 441, 620 P.2d
765.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next